Utah statutes.
17-36-23.   Transfer of unexpended appropriation balance by governing body.

At the request of the budget officer or upon its own motion, the governing body may by resolution transfer any unencumbered or unexpended appropriation balance or part thereof from one department in a fund to another department within the same fund; provided that no appropriation for debt retirement and interest, reduction of deficit, or other appropriation required by law may be reduced below the required minimum.



Enacted by Chapter 22, 1975 General Session

